California, session 20252026, AB1890.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 50711.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:50711.5. (a) The Napa County Farmworker Centers Account is hereby established, to be administered by the Department of Housing and Community Development, through its Office of Migrant Services pursuant to the authority granted in Sections 50406 and 50710, to assist in the financing, maintenance, and operation of the Napa County Housing Authority’s Farmworker Centers for year-round use by migrant or nonmigrant farm labor employees. The Napa County Housing Authority shall continue to own and operate the farmworker centers pursuant to the local ordinances, regulations, or bylaws currently applicable thereto.(b) The department shall award, annually, up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in matching funds, pursuant to this section, to the Napa County Housing Authority upon demonstration that the Napa County Housing Authority is capable of continuing to effectively serve the housing needs of migrant or other farmworkers in the County of Napa. To be eligible for funding, the Napa County Housing Authority shall provide equal or greater funds from local sources to support financing, maintenance, and operations of the housing assisted under this section. The Napa County Housing Authority shall also demonstrate its capability, upon receiving the funds awarded pursuant to this section, of ensuring the fiscal integrity of the farmworker centers and maintaining the project in a decent, safe, and sanitary manner for at least 25 years.(c) The year-round use provided for in subdivision (a) for farmworker centers may be interrupted, as necessary, to close the housing for maintenance purposes, to allow new migrant farmworkers to obtain housing, or for any other purpose the Napa County Housing Authority deems necessary.(d) Funds made available for purposes of this section may be used for the costs permitted by or pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of Section 50712.5. For purposes of soliciting and awarding funds pursuant to this section, the department shall not be required to promulgate regulations.(e) All funds awarded under this section shall comply with the prohibitions against state funding, loans, grants, or any other kind of state subsidy for housing under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 50205 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 50517.10. Any employer or other recipient of state funding who utilizes state funding under this section shall reimburse the state or state agency that provided the funding in an amount equal to the amount of that state funding expended for those purposes, in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 50205 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 50517.10.(e)(f) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall not become operative until funding is appropriated by the Legislature in the Budget Act or any other measure for the purposes of this section.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances concerning funding for the Napa County Housing Authority’s Farmworker Centers.